District of Columbia statutes.
48-804.01

Violations of posting provisions.

(a)

Any pharmacy which sells a legend drug in violation of § 48-801.03, § 48-801.04, or § 48-801.05 is liable to the buyer, or the provider or insurer of the buyer, for the full amount charged for the drug.

(b)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this subchapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this subchapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this subchapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

History

Sept. 10, 1976, D.C. Law 1-81, title IV, § 401, 23 DCR 2460
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 20, 38 DCR 314

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-741.
1973 Ed., § 33-841.